Hawaii, session 2026, HB2120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that marriage license agents play an important role in ensuring that couples marrying in Hawaii receive timely, professional, and respectful service.  Many marriage license agents are private agents who provide direct support to applicants, including responsiveness to questions, appointment scheduling, document review, and customer service throughout the licensing process. The legislature further finds that existing law limits the amount that private marriage license agents may charge for their services to five dollars per license, which may not reflect the true costs of providing this service or the level of care required to serve applicants effectively. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to better support the delivery of marriage licensing services in the State by increasing the amount of the service fee that private marriage license agents are allowed to charge. SECTION 2.  Section 572-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows: "(e)  In addition to the fee prescribed under subsection (a), the agent, except those provided for in subsection (b), shall collect from the applicant for the license a surcharge of [$5,] up to $25, of which the agent shall retain the full amount for the agent's additional benefit and compensation." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________